Hawaii statutes.
[§235-91.5] Income tax credits; ordering of
credit claims. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary providing for
the use of an income tax credit under this chapter, in the offsetting of a
taxpayer's income tax liability, tax credits that may be refunded or paid to
the taxpayer who has no income tax liability shall be used first, followed by
nonrefundable tax credits that may be used as credit against taxes in
subsequent years until exhausted. [L 2010, c 21, §2]

Note

Section applies to taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2010. L 2010, c 21, §4.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next